Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.110

Revenue bonds—Refunding.

Each public corporation may provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued for an industrial development facility under this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption or maturity of the revenue bonds and, if considered advisable by the public corporation, for the additional purpose of financing improvements, extensions, or enlargements to the industrial development facility for another industrial development facility. The issuance of the revenue bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the public corporation in respect to the same shall be governed by this chapter insofar as applicable.

[ 1981 c 300 s 11.]